Utah statutes.
67-5b-106.   Advisory Board on Children's Justice -- Membership -- Terms -- Duties -- Authority.

(1)  The attorney general shall create an Advisory Board on Children's Justice to advise him about the Children's Justice Center Program.

(2)  The board shall be composed of:

(a)  the director of each Children's Justice Center;

(b)  the attorney general or the attorney general's designee;

(c)  a representative of the Utah Sheriffs Association, appointed by the attorney general;

(d)  a chief of police, appointed by the attorney general;

(e)  one juvenile court judge and one district court judge, appointed by the chief justice;

(f) one representative of the guardians ad litem and one representative of the Court Appointed Special Advocates, appointed by the chief justice;

(g)  a designated representative of the Division of Child and Family Services within the Department of Human Services, appointed by the director of that division;

(h)  a licensed mental health professional, appointed by the attorney general;

(i)  a person experienced in working with children with disabilities, appointed by the attorney general;

(j)  one criminal defense attorney, licensed by the Utah State Bar and in good standing, appointed by the Utah Bar Commission;

(k)  one criminal prosecutor, licensed by the Utah State Bar and in good standing, appointed by the Prosecution Council;

(l)  a member of the governor's staff, appointed by the governor;

(m)  a member from the public, appointed by the attorney general, who exhibits sensitivity to the concerns of parents;

(n)  a licensed nurse practitioner or physician, appointed by the attorney general; and

(o)  additional members appointed as needed by the attorney general.

(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), as terms of current board members expire, the appointing authority shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the appointing authority shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately half of the board is appointed every two years.

(4)  The Advisory Board on Children's Justice shall:

(a)  coordinate and support the statewide purpose of the program;

(b)  recommend statewide guidelines for the administration of the program;

(c)  recommend training and improvements in training;

(d)  review, evaluate, and make recommendations concerning state investigative, administrative, and judicial handling in both civil and criminal cases of child abuse, child sexual abuse, neglect, and other crimes involving children where the child is a primary victim or a critical witness, such as in drug-related child endangerment cases;

(e)  recommend programs to improve the prompt and fair resolution of civil and criminal court proceedings; and

(f)  recommend changes to state laws and procedures to provide comprehensive protection for children from abuse, child sexual abuse, neglect, and other crimes involving children where the child is a primary victim or a critical witness, such as in drug-related child endangerment cases.

(5)  The Advisory Board on Children's Justice may not supersede the authority of contracting public agencies to oversee operation of the centers, including the budget, costs, personnel, and management pursuant to Section 67-5b-104 and Title 51, Chapter 2a, Accounting Reports from Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and Other Local Entities Act.



Amended by Chapter 255, 2009 General Session

